South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3967.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Biomass SECTION 1.    Chapter 23, Title 48 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 48-23-185.    (A) For purposes of this section: (1) "Biomass" means bioenergy feedstocks from forest products manufacturing including, without limitation: (a) forest products manufacturing residuals including, without limitation: (i) pulping liquors; (ii) pulping byproducts; (iii) woody manufacturing residuals; (iv) paper recycling residuals; (v) wastewater and processed water treatment plant residuals; and (vi) anaerobic digester biogas; (b) harvest residues including, without limitation, trees or portions of harvested trees; (c) downed wood from extreme weather events or natural disasters; (d) nonhazardous landscape or right of way trimmings and municipal trimmings; (e) plant material removed for purposes of invasive or noxious plant species control; (f) biowaste including, without limitation, landfill gas; (g) forest biomass derived from residues created as a byproduct of timber harvesting; (h) forest management activities conducted for timber stand improvement or to increase yield, for ecological restoration, or to maintain or enhance forest health; (i) biomass materials described by the United States Environmental Protection Agency as fuels pursuant to 40 C.F.R. Part 241; and (j) other wood products including, without limitation, lumber, crates, and pallets. (2) "Bioenergy with carbon capture and storage" means the process of capturing and permanently storing carbon dioxide for biomass energy generation. (B)(1) Bioenergy produced from biomass is considered renewable and carbon neutral. When bioenergy produced from biomass is paired with bioenergy with carbon capture and storage, the bioenergy is considered carbon negative. (2) Bioenergy produced from agricultural harvesting is considered renewable and carbon neutral. When the bioenergy produced from agricultural harvesting is paired with bioenergy with carbon capture and storage, the bioenergy is considered carbon negative. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 1st day of April, 2026. Approved the 6th day of April, 2026. __________